Utah statutes.
62A-5-316.   Temporary detention.

Pending removal to a mental retardation facility, an individual taken into custody or ordered to be committed under this part may be detained in his or her home, or in some other suitable facility.  The individual shall not, however, be detained in a nonmedical facility used for detention of individuals charged with or convicted of penal offenses, except in a situation of extreme emergency.  The division shall take reasonable measures, as may be necessary, to assure proper care of an individual temporarily detained under this part.

